California statutes. Public Resources Code
(C) Provision of dedicated parking for car-share or
 zero-emission vehicles, or both types of vehicle, in excess of applicable requirements.

(D) Provision of bicycle parking in excess of applicable requirements.

(E) Inclusion of a transit facility with area dedicated to shuttle bus staging, ride share, bicycle parking, and other modalities intended to reduce the use of single occupant vehicles.

(b) The Governor may certify the project for streamlining pursuant to this section if all the following conditions are met:

(1) The project will result in a minimum investment of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in California upon completion of construction.

(2) (A) (i) The project creates high-wage, highly skilled jobs that pay prevailing wages and living wages, employs a skilled and trained workforce, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code, provides construction jobs and permanent jobs for Californians, and helps reduce unemployment. For purposes of this subdivision, “jobs that pay prevailing wages” means that all construction workers employed in the execution of the project will receive at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code. If the project is certified for streamlining, the project applicant shall include this requirement in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(ii) Clause (i) does not apply to a contractor or subcontractor performing the work on the project that is subject to a project labor agreement requiring the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project and providing for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this clause, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(B) (i) If the project is certified pursuant to this subdivision, contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages.

(ii) Except as provided in clause (iii), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, or by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(iii) Clause (ii) does not apply if all
 contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(3) The project does not result in any net additional emission of greenhouse gases, including greenhouse gas emissions from employee transportation, as determined by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code. The State
 Air Resources Board is encouraged to make its determination no later than 120 calendar days after receiving an application for review of the methodology and calculations of the project’s greenhouse gas emissions.

(4) The project applicant demonstrates compliance with the requirements of Chapters 12.8 (commencing with Section 42649) and 12.9 (commencing with Section 42649.8) of Part 3 of Division 30, as applicable.

(5) The project applicant has entered into a binding and enforceable agreement that all mitigation measures required pursuant to this division and any other environmental measures required by this section to certify the project under this
 section shall be conditions of approval of the project, and those conditions will be fully enforceable by the lead agency or another agency
 designated by the lead agency. In the case of environmental mitigation measures and any other environmental measures required by this section, the applicant agrees, as an ongoing obligation, that those measures will be monitored and enforced by the lead agency for the life of the obligation. The project applicant shall submit to the lead agency an annual status report on the implementation of the environmental mitigation measures and any other environmental measures required by this section.

(6) The project applicant agrees to pay any additional costs incurred by the courts in hearing
 and deciding any case subject to this section, including payment of the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court, in a form and manner specified by the Judicial Council, as provided in the Rules of Court adopted by the Judicial Council.

(7) The project applicant agrees to pay the costs of preparing the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with review and consideration of the project pursuant to this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project.

(c) (1) The Governor may certify the project for streamlining pursuant to this section if it complies with the conditions specified in subdivision (b).

(2) (A) Prior to certifying the project, the Governor shall make a determination that each of the conditions specified in subdivision (b) has been met. These findings are not subject to judicial review.

(B) (i) If the Governor determines that the project is eligible for streamlining pursuant to this section, he or she shall submit that determination, and any supporting information, to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for review and concurrence or nonconcurrence.

(ii) Within 30 days of receiving the determination, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee shall concur or nonconcur in writing on the determination.

(iii) If the Joint Legislative Budget Committee fails to concur or nonconcur
 on a determination by the Governor within 30 days of the submittal, the project is deemed to be certified.

(3) The guidelines issued pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 21178) apply for the implementation of this section to the extent the guidelines are applicable and do not conflict with specific requirements of this section, including the transportation demand management program specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) (1) Within 10 days of the Governor certifying the project pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall, at the applicant’s expense, issue a public notice in no less than 12-point type stating the following:

“THE APPLICANT HAS ELECTED TO PROCEED UNDER SECTION 21168.6.8 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE, WHICH PROVIDES, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THAT ANY JUDICIAL ACTION CHALLENGING THE CERTIFICATION OF THE EIR OR THE APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT DESCRIBED IN THE EIR IS SUBJECT TO THE PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN SECTION 21186.6.8 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE. A COPY OF SECTION 21168.6.8 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS INCLUDED BELOW

(2) The public notice shall be distributed by the lead agency as required for public notices issued pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 21092.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the procedures set forth in subdivision (f)
 shall apply to any action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of any environmental impact report for the project that is certified pursuant to this section or the granting of any project approvals.

(f) Rules 3.2220 to 3.2237, inclusive, of the California Rules of Court, as may be amended by the Judicial Council, shall apply to
 any action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of any environmental impact report for the project or granting of any project approvals to require the actions or proceeding, including any potential appeals therefrom, to be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 270 days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court. On or before July 1, 2019, the Judicial Council shall amend the California Rules of Court, as necessary, to implement this subdivision.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the preparation and certification of the record of proceedings for the certified project shall be performed in the following manner:

(1) The lead agency for the project shall prepare the record of proceedings
 pursuant to this division concurrently with the
 administrative process.

(2) All documents and other materials placed in the record of proceedings shall be posted on, and be downloadable from, an Internet Web site maintained by the lead agency commencing with the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report.

(3) The lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format the draft environmental impact report and all other documents submitted to, or relied on by, the lead agency in the preparation of the draft environmental impact report.

(4) A document prepared by the lead agency or submitted by the applicant after the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report that is a part of the record
 of the proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five business days after the document is released or received by the lead agency.

(5) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic format, and shall make any comment available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five days of its receipt.

(6) Within 14 business days after the receipt of any comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(7) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive,
 documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency that were not prepared specifically for the project and are copyright protected are not required to be made readily accessible in an electronic format. For those copyright-protected documents, the lead agency shall make an index of these documents available in an electronic format no later than the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, or within five business days if the document is received or relied on by the lead agency after the release of the draft environmental impact report. The index shall specify the libraries or lead agency offices in which hardcopies of the copyrighted materials are available for public review.

(8) The lead agency shall certify the final record of proceedings within five days after the filing of the notice required by
 subdivision (a) of Section 21152.

(9) Any dispute arising from the record of proceedings shall be resolved by the superior court. Unless the superior court directs otherwise, a party disputing the content of the record shall file a motion to augment the record at the time it files its initial brief.

(10) The contents of the record of proceedings shall be as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6.

(h) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(i) (1) If the lead agency fails to certify an environmental impact report for the project before January 1, 2025, this section shall become inoperative and is repealed as of that date.

(2) The lead agency shall notify the Secretary of State if it fails to certified the environmental impact report for the project before January 1, 2025. 

(j) (1) As a condition of approval of the project, the lead agency shall require the applicant, with respect to any measures specific to the operation of the arena, to implement measures that will meet the requirements of this division by the end of the first NBA regular season or June of the first NBA regular season, whichever is later, during which an NBA team has played at the arena.

(2) To maximize public health, environmental, and employment benefits, the lead agency shall require measures that will reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases in the project area and in the neighboring communities of the arena.

(3) Not less than 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve the requirement of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b)
 shall be from local, direct greenhouse gas emissions reduction measures, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Project design features or onsite reduction measures, or both design features and onsite reduction measures, that include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Implementing project design features that enable the arena to exceed the building energy efficiency standards set forth in Part 6 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, except for 50 percent of emissions reductions attributable to design features necessary to meet the LEED gold certification
 requirement.

(ii) Requiring a transportation demand management program to reduce single-occupancy vehicular travel and vehicle miles traveled.

(iii) Providing onsite renewable energy generation, including a solar roof on the arena with a minimum peak generation capacity of 500 kilowatts.

(iv) Providing solar-ready roofs.

(v) Providing cool roofs and “cool parking” promoting cool surface treatment for new parking facilities.

(B) Off-site reduction measures in the neighboring communities, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Temporarily expanding the capacity of a public transit line, as appropriate, to serve arena events.

(ii) Paying its fair share of the cost of measures that expand the capacity
 of public transit, if appropriate, that is used by spectators attending arena events.

(iii) Providing funding to an off-site mitigation project consisting of replacing
 buses, trolleys, or other transit vehicles with zero-emission vehicles.

(iv) Providing off-site safety or other improvements for bicycles, pedestrians, and transit connections.

(v) Providing zero-emission transit buses to serve arena events and to meet other local transit needs, including senior and public school transportation services.

(vi) Undertaking or funding building retrofits to improve the energy efficiency of existing buildings.

(4) The applicant may obtain offset credits for up to 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). The applicant shall, to the extent feasible, place the highest priority on the purchase of offset credits that produce emission reductions within the City of Inglewood or the boundaries of the South Coast Air Quality Management District. Any offset credits shall be verified by a third party accredited by the State Air Resources Board. Offset
 credits generated by a project located outside the United States shall not be used pursuant to this paragraph.

(k) As a condition of approval of the project, the lead agency shall require the applicant, in consultation with the South Coast Air Quality Management District, to implement measures that will achieve criteria pollutant and toxic air contaminant reductions over and above any emission reductions required by other laws or regulations in communities surrounding the project consistent with emission reduction measures that may be identified for those communities pursuant to Section 44391.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(1) At a minimum, these measures shall achieve reductions of a minimum of 400 tons of oxides of nitrogen and 10 tons of PM2.5, as defined in Section
 39047.2 of the Health and Safety Code, over 10 years following the commencement of construction of the project. Of these amounts, reductions of a minimum of 130 tons of oxides of nitrogen and 3 tons of PM2.5 shall be achieved within the first year following commencement of construction of the project. The reductions required pursuant to this paragraph are in addition to any other requirements imposed by other laws.

(2) If the project applicant can demonstrate and verify to the South Coast Air Quality Management District that it has invested at least thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) to achieve the requirements of this subdivision, the requirements of this subdivision shall be deemed met, so long as one-half of the reductions set forth in paragraph (1) are met.

(3) Greenhouse gas emissions reductions achieved pursuant to this subdivision shall count toward the applicant’s
 obligations under paragraph (3) of subdivision (j).

(l) This section does not apply to a project that proposes the construction of a new
 gambling establishment, as defined in Section 19805 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 337 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 961, Sec. 1.   (AB 987)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Conditionally repealed on January 1, 2025, as provided in subd. (i).)
-------------------------------------------

21168.7.

Sections 21168 and 21168.5 are declaratory of existing law with respect to the judicial review of determinations or decisions of public agencies made pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.9.

(a) If a court finds, as a result of a trial, hearing, or remand from an appellate court, that any determination, finding, or decision of a public agency has been made without compliance with this division, the court shall enter an order that includes one or more of the following:

(1) A mandate that the determination, finding, or decision be voided by the public agency, in whole or in part.

(2) If the court finds that a specific project activity or activities will prejudice the consideration or implementation of particular mitigation measures or alternatives to the project, a mandate that the public agency and any real parties in interest suspend any or all specific project activity or activities, pursuant to the determination, finding, or decision, that could result in an adverse change or alteration to the physical environment, until the public agency has taken any actions that may be necessary to bring the determination, finding, or decision into compliance with this division.

(3) A mandate that the public agency take specific action as may be necessary to bring the determination, finding, or decision into compliance with this division.

(b) Any order pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include only those mandates which are necessary to achieve compliance with this division and only those specific project activities in noncompliance with this division. The order shall be made by the issuance of a peremptory writ of mandate specifying what action by the public agency is necessary to comply with this division. However, the order shall be limited to that portion of a determination, finding, or decision or the specific project activity or activities found to be in noncompliance only if a court finds that (1) the portion or specific project activity or activities are severable, (2) severance will not prejudice complete and full compliance with this division, and (3) the court has not found the remainder of the project to be in noncompliance with this division. The trial court shall retain jurisdiction over the public agency’s proceedings by way of a return to the peremptory writ until the court has determined that the public agency has complied with this division.

(c) Nothing in this section authorizes a court to direct any public agency to exercise its discretion in any particular way. Except as expressly provided in this section, nothing in this section is intended to limit the equitable powers of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1131, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21169.

Any project defined in subdivision (c) of Section 21065 undertaken, carried out or approved on or before the effective date of this section and the issuance by any public agency of any lease, permit, license, certificate or other entitlement for use executed or issued on or before the effective date of this section notwithstanding a failure to comply with this division, if otherwise legal and valid, is hereby confirmed, validated and declared legally effective. Any project undertaken by a person which was supported in whole or part through contracts with one or more public agencies on or before the effective date of this section, notwithstanding a failure to comply with this division, if otherwise legal and valid, is hereby confirmed, validated and declared legally effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21173.

If any provision of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this division which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application thereof, and to this end the provisions of this division are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21174.

No provision of this division is a limitation or restriction on the power or authority of any public agency in the enforcement or administration of any provision of law which it is specifically permitted or required to enforce or administer, including, but not limited to, the powers and authority granted to the California Coastal Commission pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000). To the extent of any inconsistency or conflict between the provisions of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000)) and the provisions of this division, the provisions of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) shall control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21177.

(a) An action or proceeding shall not be brought pursuant to Section 21167 unless the alleged grounds for noncompliance with this division were presented to the public agency orally or in writing by any person during the public comment period provided by this division or before the close of the public hearing on the project before the issuance of the notice of determination.

(b) A person shall not maintain an action or proceeding unless that person objected to the approval of the project orally or in writing during the public comment period provided by this division or before the close of the public hearing on the project before the filing of notice of determination pursuant to Sections 21108 and 21152.

(c) This section does not preclude any organization formed after the approval of a project from maintaining an action pursuant to Section 21167 if a member of that organization has complied with subdivision (b).

(d) This section does not apply to the Attorney General.

(e) This section does not apply to any alleged grounds for noncompliance with this division for which there was no public hearing or other opportunity for members of the public to raise those objections orally or in writing before the approval of the project, or if the public agency failed to give the notice required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 466, Sec. 10.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5.  Jobs and Economic Improvement Through Environmental Leadership Act of 2021 [21178. - 21189.3.]

21178.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) requires that the environmental impacts of development projects be identified and mitigated.

(b) The California Environmental Quality Act also guarantees the public an opportunity to review and comment on the environmental impacts of a project and to participate meaningfully in the development of mitigation measures for potentially significant environmental impacts.

(c) There are large projects under consideration in various regions of the state that would replace old and outmoded facilities
 with new job-creating facilities to meet those regions’ needs while also establishing new, cutting-edge environmental benefits in those regions.

(d) These projects are privately financed or financed from revenues generated from the projects themselves and do not require taxpayer financing.

(e) These projects will further generate thousands of full-time jobs during construction and thousands of additional, permanent jobs once the projects are constructed and operating.

(f) These projects also present an unprecedented opportunity to implement nation-leading innovative measures that will significantly reduce traffic, air quality, and other significant environmental impacts, and fully mitigate the greenhouse gas emissions resulting from passenger vehicle trips attributed to the projects.

(g) These pollution reductions will be the best in the nation compared to other comparable projects in the United States.

(h) The purpose of this chapter is to provide, for a limited time, unique and unprecedented streamlining benefits under the California Environmental Quality Act for projects that provide the benefits described above to put people to work as soon as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21180.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Applicant” means a public or private entity or its affiliates, or a person or entity that undertakes a public works project, that proposes a project and its successors, heirs, and assignees.

(b) “Environmental leadership development project,” “leadership project,” or “project” means a project as described in Section 21065 that is one of the following:

(1) A residential, retail, commercial, sports, cultural, entertainment, or recreational use project that is certified as Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) gold or better by the United States Green Building Council and, where
 applicable, that achieves a 15-percent greater standard for transportation efficiency than for comparable projects. These projects must be located on an infill site. For a project that is within a metropolitan planning organization for which a sustainable communities strategy or alternative planning strategy is in effect, the infill project shall be consistent with the general use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, for which the State Air Resources Board has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination, under subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.

(2) A clean renewable energy
 project that generates electricity exclusively through wind or solar, but not including waste incineration or conversion.

(3) A clean energy manufacturing project that manufactures products, equipment, or components used for renewable energy generation, energy efficiency, or for the production of clean alternative fuel vehicles.

(4) (A) A housing development project that meets all of the following conditions:

(i) The housing development project is located on an infill site.

(ii) For a housing development project that is located within a metropolitan planning organization for which a sustainable communities strategy or alternative planning strategy is in effect, the project is consistent with the general use designation, density,
 building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, for which the State Air Resources Board has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination, under subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.

(iii) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21183, the housing development project will result in a minimum investment of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in California upon completion of construction.

(iv) (I) Except as provided in subclause (II), at least 15 percent of the housing development project is dedicated as
 housing that is affordable to lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon completion of a housing development project that is qualified under this paragraph and is certified by the Governor, the lead agency or applicant of the project shall notify the Office of Planning and Research of the number of housing units and affordable housing units established by the project.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), if a local agency has adopted an inclusionary zoning ordinance that establishes a minimum percentage for affordable housing within the jurisdiction in which the housing development project is located that is higher than 15 percent, the percentage specified in the inclusionary zoning ordinance shall be the threshold for affordable housing.

(v) (I) Except for use as a residential hotel, as defined in Section 50519
 of the Health and Safety Code, no part of the housing development project shall be used for a rental unit for a term shorter than 30 days, or designated for hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other transient lodging use.

(II) No part of the housing development project shall be used for manufacturing or industrial uses.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “housing development project” means a project for any of the following:

(i) Residential units only.

(ii) Mixed-use developments consisting of residential and nonresidential uses with at least two-thirds of the square footage designated for residential use.

(iii) Transitional housing or supportive housing.

(c) “Infill site” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 21061.3.

(d) “Transportation efficiency” means the number of vehicle trips by employees, visitors, or customers of the residential, retail, commercial, sports, cultural, entertainment, or recreational use project divided by the total number of employees, visitors, and customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 60.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21181.

This chapter does not apply to a project if the Governor does not certify the project as an environmental leadership development project eligible for streamlining under this chapter before January 1, 2032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 2.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21182.

A person proposing to construct a leadership project may apply to the Governor for certification that the leadership project is eligible for streamlining as provided by this chapter. The person shall supply evidence and materials that the Governor deems necessary to make a decision on the application. Any evidence or materials shall be made available to the public at least 15 days before the Governor certifies a project under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21183.

The Governor may certify a leadership project for streamlining before a lead agency certifies a final environmental impact report for a project under this chapter if all the following conditions are met:

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the project will result in a minimum investment of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in California upon completion of construction.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a leadership project described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 21180.

(b) The project creates high-wage, highly skilled jobs that pay prevailing wages and living wages, provides construction jobs and
 permanent jobs for Californians, helps reduce unemployment, and promotes apprenticeship training. For purposes of this subdivision, a project is deemed to create jobs that pay prevailing wages, create highly skilled jobs, and promote apprenticeship training if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Governor that the project will comply with Section 21183.5.

(c) (1) For a project described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 21180, the project does not result in any net additional emission of greenhouse gases, including greenhouse gas emissions from employee transportation. For purposes of this paragraph, a project is deemed to meet the requirements of this paragraph if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Governor that the project will comply with Section 21183.6.

(2) For a project described in paragraph
 (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 21180, the project does not result in any net additional emission of greenhouse gases, including greenhouse gas emissions from employee transportation, or demonstrates consistency with the most recent scoping plan adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 38561 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The applicant demonstrates compliance with the requirements of Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 42649) and Chapter 12.9 (commencing with Section 42649.8) of Part 3 of Division 30, as applicable.

(e) The applicant has entered into a binding and enforceable agreement that all mitigation measures required under this division to certify the project under this chapter shall be conditions of approval of the project, and those conditions will be fully enforceable by the lead agency or another agency designated by the lead agency. In the
 case of environmental mitigation measures, the applicant agrees, as an ongoing obligation, that those measures will be monitored and enforced by the lead agency for the life of the obligation.

(f) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of the trial court and the court of appeal in hearing and deciding any case challenging a lead agency’s action on a certified project under this division, including payment of the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court, in a form and manner specified by the Judicial Council, as provided in the California Rules of Court adopted by the Judicial Council under Section 21185.

(g) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of preparing the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with review and consideration of the project under this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project.
 The cost of preparing the record of proceedings for the project shall not be recoverable from the plaintiff or petitioner before, during, or after any litigation.

(h) For a project for which environmental review has commenced, the applicant demonstrates that the record of proceedings is being prepared in accordance with Section 21186.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 61.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21183.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as set forth in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) (1) For a project undertaken by a public agency that is certified under this chapter, except as provided in paragraph (2), an entity shall not be prequalified
 or shortlisted or awarded a contract by the public agency to perform any portion of the project unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the public agency that the entity and its contractors and subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The public agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors at every tier performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the public agency before January 1, 2021.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all of its contractors and subcontractors at every tier performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(c) For a project undertaken by a private entity that is certified under this chapter, the applicant shall do both of the following:

(1) Certify to the lead agency that either of the following is true:

(A) The entirety
 of the project is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(B) If the project is not in its entirety a public work, all construction workers employed in the execution of the project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations under Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate. If the project is subject to this subparagraph, then, for those portions of the project that are not a public work, all of the following shall apply:

(i) The applicant shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(ii) All contractors and subcontractors at every tier shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the work on the project or contract at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.
